Wisconsin, session 2025, SB529.
do enact as follows:SB529,11Section 1. 13.94 (1) (ms) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,22Section 2. 20.250 (2) (h) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,33Section 3. 20.566 (1) (hp) of the statutes is amended to read:SB529,7,10420.566 (1) (hp) Administration of income tax checkoff voluntary payments. 5The amounts in the schedule for the payment of all administrative costs, including 6data processing costs, incurred in administering ss. 71.10 (5), (5e), (5f), (5fm), (5g), 7(5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5km), and (5m), and 71.30 (10). All moneys specified for deposit 8in this appropriation under ss. 71.10 (5) (h) 5., (5e) (h) 4., (5f) (i), (5fm) (i), (5g) (i), 9(5h) (i), (5i) (i), (5j) (i), (5k) (i), (5km) (i), and (5m) (i) and 71.30 (10) (i) and (11) (i) 10shall be credited to this appropriation account.SB529,411Section 4. 20.835 (2) (bb) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,512Section 5. 20.835 (2) (cc) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,613Section 6. 20.835 (2) (ff) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,714Section 7. 71.01 (6) (j) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,815Section 8. 71.01 (6) (k) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,916Section 9. 71.01 (6) (L) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,1017Section 10. 71.01 (6) (m) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,1118Section 11. 71.01 (7g) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,1219Section 12. 71.01 (7r) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,1320Section 13. 71.01 (13) of the statutes is amended to read:SB529,8,3171.01 (13) “Wisconsin adjusted gross income” means federal adjusted gross 2income, with the modifications prescribed in s. 71.05 (6) to (12), (19), (20), (24), (25), 3(25m), and (26).SB529,144Section 14. 71.03 (7) (a) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,155Section 15. 71.03 (7) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,166Section 16. 71.03 (7) (c) of the statutes is repealed.SB529,177Section 17. 71.04 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb529 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb529 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB529 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB529 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB529: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting